Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 4. Smithfield Hams.

§ 3.2-5419.
Smithfield hams defined.

Genuine Smithfield hams are hereby defined to be hams processed, treated, smoked, aged, cured by the long-cure, dry salt method of cure and aged for a minimum period of six months; such six-month period to commence when the green pork cut is first introduced to dry salt, all such salting, processing, treating, smoking, curing, and aging to be done within the corporate limits of the town of Smithfield, Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-667; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-867; 1968, c. 140; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5420.
Only genuine Smithfield hams to be labeled or advertised as such.

No person shall knowingly, label, stamp, pack, advertise, sell, or offer for sale any ham, either wrapped or unwrapped, in a container or loose, as a genuine Smithfield ham unless such ham be a genuine Smithfield ham as defined in §

3.2-5419

.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-668; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-868; 1968, c. 140; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5421.
Penalty for violation.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-671; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-871; 1968, c. 140; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.